Missouri, session 2026, HB1865.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 217.695, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 217.695, to read as follows:
217.695. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Chief law enforcement official", the county sheriff, chief of police or other public
official responsible for enforcement of criminal laws within a county or city not within a
county;
(2) "County" includes a city not within a county;
(3) "Offender", a person in the custody of the department or under the supervision of
the division of probation and parole.
2. Each offender to be released from custody of the department who will be under the
supervision of the division of probation and parole, except an offender transferred to another
state pursuant to the interstate corrections compact, shall shortly before release be required to:
complete a registration form indicating his or her intended address upon release, employer,
parent's address, and such other information as may be required; submit to photographs;
submit to fingerprints; or undergo other identification procedures including but not limited to
hair samples or other identification indicia. All data and indicia of identification shall be
compiled in duplicate, with one set to be retained by the department, and one set for the chief
law enforcement official of the county of intended residence.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1865 2
3. Any offender subject to the provisions of this section who changes his or her
county of residence shall, in addition to notifying the division of probation and parole, notify
and register with the chief law enforcement official of the county of residence within seven
days after he or she changes his or her residence to that county.
4. Failure by an offender to register with the chief law enforcement official upon a
change in the county of his or her residence shall be cause for revocation of the parole of the
person except for good cause shown.
5. The department, the division of probation and parole, and the chief law
enforcement official shall cause the information collected on the initial registration and any
subsequent changes in residence or registration to be recorded with the highway patrol
criminal information system.
6. The director of the department of public safety shall design and distribute the
registration forms required by this section and shall provide any administrative assistance
needed to facilitate the provisions of this section.
7. In addition to the other requirements of this section, the division of probation
and parole shall maintain a web page on the internet containing the names of all
offenders who have been found guilty of, or pled guilty to, second degree murder under
subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of section 565.021 and are released from custody of the
department under the supervision of the division of probation and parole. The division
shall update the web page when an offender who meets the criteria for inclusion on the
list is placed under the supervision of the division, is released from the supervision of the
division, or relocates to this state under the interstate compact for adult offender
supervision under sections 589.500 to 589.569. The list shall be accessible to the public
and shall include a search capability.
✔